Connecticut, session 2026, SB00511.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Municipally attributable revenue" or "MAR" means the sum of
the portion of revenue, as determined by the Department of Revenue
Services, from (A) the tax imposed by chapter 219 of the general statutes
that is attributable to sales occurring at a specific physical business
location within a municipality, (B) the withholding portion of the tax
imposed by chapter 229 of the general statutes that is attributable to
wages earned at a physical place of employment located within a
municipality, and (C) the tax imposed by chapter 208 of the general
statutes that is attributable to business activity occurring within a
physical nexus in a municipality;
(2) "MAR baseline" means the amount of the municipally attributable
sSB511 / File No. 655 1

sSB511 File No. 655
revenue of a municipality for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026; and
(3) "Municipality" means any town, city, consolidated town and city
or consolidated town and borough.
(b) (1) There is established an account to be known as the "state-wide
municipal growth account", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing
account. The account shall contain any moneys required by law to be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be expended by
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management for the purpose of
distributing municipal growth dividends to municipalities in
accordance with subsection (d) of this section.
(2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and annually thereafter,
the aggregate amount of the municipal growth dividend for all
municipalities as determined under subsection (c) of this section shall
be transferred by the Treasurer to the account. Investment earnings
credited to the account shall become part of the assets of the account.
(c) The Department of Revenue Services shall determine, not later
than November 1, 2028, the MAR baseline for each municipality.
Commencing with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and annually
thereafter, the department shall determine the municipally attributable
revenue for each municipality for the applicable fiscal year and provide
all determinations made pursuant to this subsection to the Office of
Policy and Management.
(d) (1) Commencing with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2031, and
annually thereafter, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management shall distribute municipal growth dividends to
municipalities in the amount of one-half of one per cent of the
municipality's MAR for the preceding fiscal year, except that:
(A) If a municipality's MAR for a fiscal year is below its MAR
baseline, such municipality shall receive no municipal growth dividend
distribution for such fiscal year; and
(B) For any municipal development project that is intended to
sSB511 / File No. 655 2

sSB511 File No. 655
support municipal economic growth and for which the state has
provided instrumental capital, the municipality shall receive, in lieu of
the distribution under this subsection, fifty per cent of the municipal
growth dividend attributable to such project and the state shall receive
fifty per cent of such growth dividend until the full amount of the state
capital expenditure has been recouped.
(2) Any distributions received by a municipality pursuant to this
section shall be used by the municipality to provide municipal services
in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this section or to
reduce the municipality's mill rate, or both.
(e) Each municipality shall establish a municipal revenue
stabilization fund and all distributions received by a municipality
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in such fund. For the purpose
of providing municipal services, a municipality may use the moneys in
such fund as a one-time expenditure or as an ongoing expenditure,
provided the legislative body of the municipality certifies that such fund
is sufficiently capitalized to sustain such ongoing expenditure for not
less than three fiscal years.
(f) Not later than November 1, 2030, and annually thereafter, the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall submit, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding and
local governments a report that sets forth for each municipality for the
applicable fiscal year the municipally attributable revenue and
information regarding any municipal growth dividends distributed to
the municipality.
Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 2-35 of the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) The state budget act passed by the legislature for funding the
expenses of operations of the state government in the ensuing biennium
shall contain a statement of estimated revenue, based upon the most
sSB511 / File No. 655 3

sSB511 File No. 655
recent consensus revenue estimate or the revised consensus revenue
estimate issued pursuant to section 2-36c, itemized by major source, for
each appropriated fund, and supplied by the joint standing committee
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to state
finance, revenue and bonding.
(2) Commencing in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018:
(A) Such itemization shall include the estimate for each major
component of the personal income tax imposed pursuant to chapter 229
as follows: Withholding payments and estimated and final payments;
and
(B) Commencing with the consensus revenue estimate or revised
consensus revenue estimate maintained or revised not later than
November 10, 2017, each consensus revenue estimate or revised
consensus revenue estimate shall include a line item designated as the
volatility adjustment that reflects the amount of the estimated transfer
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 4-30a.
(3) Commencing in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, each
consensus revenue estimate or revised consensus revenue estimate shall
include a line item designated as the municipal growth dividend that
reflects the amount of the estimated transfer pursuant to subdivision (2)
of subsection (b) of section 1 of this act.
[(2)] (4) The statement of estimated revenue applicable to each such
fund shall include, for any fiscal year, an estimate of total revenue with
respect to such fund, which amount shall be reduced by (A) an estimate
100 of total refunds of taxes to be paid from such revenue in accordance with
101 the authorization in section 12-39f, and (B) an estimate of total refunds
102 of payments to be paid from such revenue in accordance with the
103 provisions of sections 3-70a and 4-37.
104 [(3)] (5) The total estimated revenue for each fund, as adjusted in
105 accordance with this section, shall not be less than the total net
106 appropriations made from each fund plus, for the fiscal year ending
sSB511 / File No. 655 4

sSB511 File No. 655
107 June 30, 2014, and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount necessary to
108 extinguish any unassigned negative balance in each budgeted fund as
109 addressed in the most recently issued annual report of the Comptroller
110 published in accordance with section 3-115. On or before July first of
111 each fiscal year, the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
112 having cognizance of matters relating to state finance, revenue and
113 bonding shall, if any revisions in such estimates are required by virtue
114 of legislative amendments to the revenue measures proposed by said
115 committee, changes in conditions or receipt of new information since
116 the original estimate was supplied, meet and revise such estimates and,
117 through its cochairpersons, report to the Comptroller any such
118 revisions.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 2-35(b)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(f), ", the adjusted baseline" was deleted for consistency.
FIN Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB511 / File No. 655 5

sSB511 File No. 655
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Cost Potential Potential
Resources of the General Fund GF - Revenue Loss None None
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Revenue Gain None None
Explanation
The bill has a significant state and municipal revenue impact,
described below, and reflected in the "out years" table at the bottom of
the fiscal note.
The bill expands municipal revenue sharing to include 0.5% of state
revenue from the: 1) withholding portion of the personal income tax; 2)
corporation business tax, and 3) the General Fund's remaining portion
of the sales and use tax.1 For reference, 0.5% of the aggregate amount of
these revenue streams is projected to be $88.2 million in FY 29.
Under the bill, the state revenue would begin to be set aside in FY 30
and distributed to municipalities beginning in FY 31 as municipal
growth dividends.
The municipal growth dividend amounts per municipality would be
By law, 0.5 of the 6.35 general sales tax (equal to 7.87% of the total rate) is shared via
the Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund.
sSB511 / File No. 655 6

sSB511 File No. 655
determined according to each municipality's respective growth from a
baseline determined by the Department of Revenue Services.
There is a potential cost to the Office of Policy and Management
beginning in FY 27 to the extent additional resources are necessary to (1)
manage the new Municipal Growth Account, and (2) submit a report
annually beginning November 1, 2030.
The bill results in a revenue gain to municipalities beginning in FY 31
that is dependent on the funds available and if the municipality meets
certain requirements.
The Out Years
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 29 $ FY 30 $ FY 31 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Cost Potential Potential Potential
Resources of the GF - Revenue None 88,200,000 90,600,000
General Fund Loss
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 29 $ FY 30 $ FY 31 $
All Municipalities Revenue Gain None None 88,200,000
sSB511 / File No. 655 7

sSB511 File No. 655
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 511
AN ACT ESTABLISHING MUNICIPAL GROWTH DIVIDEND
PAYMENTS.